Nebraska, session 109, LB463.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB463 LB463
2025 2025
Section 1. Section 68-996, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
68-996 (1) The Medicaid Managed Care Excess Profit Fund is created.
The fund shall contain money returned to the State Treasurer pursuant to
subdivision (3) of section 68-995.
(2) The fund shall first be used to offset any losses under
subdivision (2) of section 68-995 and then to provide for (a) services
addressing the health needs of adults and children under the Medical
Assistance Act, including filling service gaps, (b) providing system
improvements, (c) providing evidence-based early intervention home
visitation programs, (d) providing medical respite services, (e)
translation and interpretation services, (f) providing coverage for
continuous glucose monitors as described in section 68-911, (g) providing
other services sustaining access to care, (h) services under the Nebraska
Prenatal Plus Program, (i) and providing grants pursuant to the
Intergenerational Care Facility Incentive Grant Program, and (j) grants
for costs associated with a cardiac emergency response plan pursuant to
section 7 of this act, as determined by the Legislature. The fund shall
only be used for the purposes described in this section.
(3) Any money in the fund available for investment shall be invested
by the state investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital
Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act. Beginning
October 1, 2024, any investment earnings from investment of money in the
fund shall be credited to the General Fund.
Sec. 2. Section 79-2,144, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
79-2,144 The state school security director appointed pursuant to
section 79-2,143 shall be responsible for providing leadership and
support for safety and security for the public schools. Duties of the
director include, but are not limited to:
(1) Collecting safety and security plans, required pursuant to rules
-2-

LB463 LB463
2025 2025
and regulations of the State Department of Education relating to
accreditation of schools, and other school security information from each
school system in Nebraska. School districts shall provide the state
school security director with the safety and security plans of the school
district and any other security information requested by the director,
but any plans or information submitted by a school district may be
withheld by the department pursuant to subdivision (9) of section
84-712.05;
(2) Recommending minimum standards for school security on or before
January 1, 2016, to the State Board of Education;
(3) Conducting an assessment of the security of each public school
building, which assessment shall be completed by August 31, 2019;
(4) Identifying deficiencies in school security based on the minimum
standards adopted by the State Board of Education and making
recommendations to school boards for remedying such deficiencies;
(5) Establishing security awareness and preparedness tools and
training programs for public school staff;
(6) Establishing research-based model instructional programs for
staff, students, and parents to address the underlying causes for violent
attacks on schools;
(7) Overseeing behavioral and mental health training, with a focus
on suicide awareness and prevention in public schools pursuant to section
79-2,146;
(8) Establishing tornado preparedness standards which shall include,
but not be limited to, ensuring that every school conducts at least two
tornado drills per year;
(9) Responding to inquiries and requests for assistance relating to
school security from private, denominational, and parochial schools;
(10) Recommending curricular and extracurricular materials to assist
school districts in preventing and responding to cyberbullying and
digital citizenship issues; and
-3-

LB463 LB463
2025 2025
(11) Establishing a cardiac emergency response plan template for use
by schools in developing a plan to respond in the event of a sudden
cardiac arrest on school grounds or at any school sponsored activity or
event pursuant to section 6 of this act. The cardiac emergency response
plan template shall integrate core elements established by the American
Heart Association or other nationally recognized cardiovascular care
organizations for response in the event of a cardiac arrest, and shall at
a minimum include the following requirements:
(a) Establishment of a school cardiac emergency response team;
(b) Activation of the cardiac emergency response team when an
individual experiences sudden cardiac arrest on school grounds or at a
school sponsored activity or event;
(c) Placement of automated external defibrillators on school
grounds;
(d) Routine maintenance of automated external defibrillators;
(e) Distribution of the cardiac emergency response plan on school
grounds;
(f) Stipulation of appropriate school personnel to receive training,
including licensed coaches, school nurses, and athletic trainers;
(g) Training of stipulated school personnel and the cardiac
emergency response team in first aid, cardiopulmonary resuscitation, and
automated external defibrillator use;
(h) Annual practice by faculty and students of the cardiac emergency
response plan using drills;
(i) Coordination with local emergency medical services providers;
and
(j) Annual review and evaluation of the cardiac emergency response
plan by the school board of the school district; and
(12) (11) Carrying out the department's responsibilities under the
School Safety and Security Reporting System Act.
Sec. 3. Section 79-3101, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
-4-

LB463 LB463
2025 2025
amended to read:
79-3101 Sections 79-3101 to 79-3107 and sections 6 and 7 of this act
shall be known and may be cited as the School Safety and Security
Reporting System Act.
Sec. 4. Section 79-3103, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
79-3103 For purposes of the School Safety and Security Reporting
System Act:
(1) Cardiac emergency response plan means a written document
establishing the specific steps to reduce the chance of death from
cardiac arrest developed by a school district pursuant to section 6 of
this act, which shall include the core elements established by the
American Heart Association or other cardiovascular care organizations for
response in the event of a cardiac arrest;
(2) Cardiac emergency response team means a school-based team of
members who have automated external defibrillator and cardiopulmonary
resuscitation training and are designated to respond to and provide basic
life support during a cardiac emergency. Team members shall have
different assigned roles, which may vary for each school district. Team
members include, but are not limited to, the principal or principal's
designee, a health care professional, and a member of the school staff;
(3) (1) Concerning behavior includes, but is not limited to,
suicide, bullying, stalking behavior, cyber or electronic harassment,
bomb threat, family violence, physical or sexual abuse, threat to
property, behavior indicative of terrorism, assault or attack,
inappropriate weapons use, concern about mental health or substance use,
sexual exploitation or predation, and any direct or indirect threatening
statement;
(4) (2) Department means the State Department of Education or the
state school security director;
(5) (3) Mental health professional means a school psychologist,
-5-

LB463 LB463
2025 2025
social worker, or licensed mental health professional;
(6) (4) Report line staff means the staff of the Safe2HelpNE report
line as provided in subsection (4) of section 79-3104;
(7) (5) Safe2HelpNE report line means the reporting system
established pursuant to section 79-3104;
(8) (6) Threat assessment means an evidence-based process to reduce
potential risks and incidents of violence resulting in harm to one or
more persons or school property; and
(9) (7) Threat assessment team means a school-based team of at least
five members who have completed the training required pursuant to section
79-3105 and includes, but is not limited to, the principal or principal's
designee, a mental health professional, and a member of the school staff.
Sec. 5. Section 79-3105, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
79-3105 (1) The department shall provide training for the members of
any threat assessment team serving a public or nonpublic school. Such
training shall provide the knowledge and skill to allow threat assessment
teams to work collaboratively to conduct threat assessments, engage in
crisis intervention, increase awareness of concerning behavior among
school staff, students, and the public, and interrupt violence in the
planning stage to thwart potential harm to persons and property. Such
training shall be reasonable in length.
(2) The department shall provide training for the members of any
cardiac emergency response team serving a public or nonpublic school.
Such training shall provide the knowledge and skill to allow cardiac
emergency response teams to work collaboratively to react in the case of
a sudden cardiac arrest among school staff, students, and the public.
Such training shall be reasonable in length.
Sec. 6. (1) For purposes of this section:
(a) Automated external defibrillator means a lightweight, portable
device capable of delivering an electric shock through an individual's
-6-

LB463 LB463
2025 2025
chest to the individual's heart, which is used in the event of a cardiac
arrest to attempt to stop an irregular heartbeat and allow a normal
rhythm to resume; and
(b) Cardiac arrest means a life-threatening event in which an
individual's heart unexpectedly stops beating.
(2) Beginning in school year 2026-27, each school district shall:
(a) Develop and adopt a cardiac emergency response plan using the
template developed by the state school security director pursuant to
section 79-2,144 for use by school personnel when an individual
experiences sudden cardiac arrest on school grounds or at a school
sponsored activity or athletic event;
(b) Place automated external defibrillators on school grounds at
locations and in a manner consistent with the guidelines established by
the American Heart Association or another nationally recognized
organization focused on emergency cardiovascular care;
(c) Place an automated external defibrillator in an easily
accessible location onsite at each school athletic venue when a school
sponsored activity or athletic event is taking place;
(d) Identify each automated external defibrillator with appropriate
signage; and
(e) Ensure each automated external defibrillator available on school
grounds or at a school athletic venue as required pursuant to this
section is in an unlocked location that allows the automated external
defibrillator to be retrieved and placed on an individual experiencing
cardiac arrest in fewer than three minutes.
(3) An approved or accredited nonpublic school may develop and adopt
a cardiac emergency response plan using the template developed by the
state school security director pursuant to section 79-2,144.
Sec. 7. (1) The State Department of Education shall develop a grant
program to provide grants to school districts for costs associated with
the development and implementation of a cardiac emergency response plan
-7-

LB463 LB463
2025 2025
required pursuant to section 6 of this act.
(2) A school district may apply to the department, in a manner
prescribed by the department, for a grant to develop and implement a
cardiac emergency response plan. Such application shall include:
(a) The name of the school district and a contact person;
(c) The amount of funds requested and the use of such funds; and
(d) Any other information the department may require.
(3) Subject to available funding, the State Department of Education
shall provide grants to school districts pursuant to this section. Such
grants shall be funded using funds from the Medicaid Managed Care Excess
Profit Fund. The department shall develop a priority system for awarding
grants, with first priority to school districts that receive Title I
funds pursuant to the federal Every Student Succeeds Act, 20 U.S.C. 6301
et seq. The total amount of grants provided pursuant to this section
shall not exceed one million five hundred thousand dollars.
Sec. 8. Section 79-3108, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
79-3108 (1) The Commissioner of Education shall create and
administer a competitive grant program to provide funding to school
districts and to educational service units on behalf of approved or
accredited nonpublic schools for safety and security-related
infrastructure projects. Such qualifying projects may include, but are
not limited to, surveillance equipment, door-locking systems, and double-
entry doors for school buildings. Subject to available appropriations,
the State Department of Education shall provide a grant to any school
district or educational service unit that applies for such grant for use
in funding qualifying projects.
(2)(a) A school district may apply to the State Department of
Education for a grant on forms and in a manner prescribed by the
Commissioner of Education. A school district receiving a grant under this
section shall divide the use of grant funds as evenly as possible among
-8-

LB463 LB463
2025 2025
all eligible school buildings within such district.
(b) An educational service unit may apply to the State Department of
Education for a grant on forms and in a manner prescribed by the
Commissioner of Education for use in funding qualifying projects at
approved or accredited nonpublic schools which contract with such
educational service unit on such qualifying projects. An approved or
accredited nonpublic school may apply to and contract with the
appropriate educational service unit in the school's area in a manner
prescribed by the educational service unit for purposes of funding
qualifying projects pursuant to this section.
(3)(a) On or before December 1 of each year that grants were issued
pursuant to this section, the State Department of Education shall provide
a report electronically to the Clerk of the Legislature relating to such
grants, which shall include, but need not be limited to:
(i) The number of schools that received grant funding, including
whether a school was public or nonpublic, the grades of students served
by such school, the number of students that attend such school, and the
geographic location of such school;
(ii) How the grant funds were used;
(iii) The average amount of grant funds received by schools broken
down by school student population size;
(iv) The number of schools that were denied grant funding and why;
and
(v) Any other information the State Department of Education deems
necessary.
(b) The report provided pursuant to subdivision (a) of this
subsection shall not identify any particular school.
(4) The State Board of Education may adopt and promulgate rules and
regulations to carry out this section.
(5) It is the intent of the Legislature to appropriate ten million
dollars from the School Safety and Security Fund to the State Department
-9-

LB463 LB463
2025 2025
of Education to administer the grant program pursuant to this section.
Sec. 9. Section 79-3109, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
79-3109 The School Safety and Security Fund is created. The fund
shall be administered by the State Department of Education and shall
consist of any money transferred by the Legislature and any gifts,
grants, or bequests. The department shall use money in the fund for
grants for safety and security-related infrastructure projects pursuant
to section 79-3108. Any money in the fund available for investment shall
be invested by the state investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska
Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act.
Beginning October 1, 2024, any investment earnings from investment of
money in the fund shall be credited to the General Fund.
Sec. 10. Original sections 79-2,144, 79-3101, 79-3103, 79-3105,
79-3108, and 79-3109, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, and section
68-996, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024, are repealed.
-10-